Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2041
Temporary educational or visiting faculty permits; recommend, when.

The recommendation of the board for the issuance of any temporary educational permits or any visiting faculty permits shall be made at regular meetings of such board, but the chairperson or one other member of the board shall have the power to recommend the issuance of such permits between the meetings of the board.

Laws 1969, c. 560, § 15, p. 2285;

Laws 1971, LB 150, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 87;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.09;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 699.